Utah statutes.
58-61-303.   Status of licenses held on the effective date of this chapter.
An individual holding a valid Utah license as a psychologist under any
licensing or practice acts in this title in effect immediately prior to July
1, 1994, is on and after July 1, 1994, considered to hold a current license
under this chapter in the comparable classification as a psychologist.
